Hawaii statutes.
§37-39 Reduction of allotted amounts for
objects and items. The head of a department or establishment may, at any
time during any allotment period, reduce the expenditure of money appropriated
and allotted for that period for specific items and objects within the
classification of expenditures prescribed in the appropriation measure and
allotted to the department or establishment. [L Sp 1959 1st, c 12, pt of §3;
Supp, §35-27; HRS §37-39]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next